Maine, session 132, LD367.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
PART A
Sec. A-1. Authorization of bonds. The Treasurer of State is authorized, under the
direction of the Governor, to issue bonds in the name and on behalf of the State in an
amount not exceeding $100,000,000 for the purposes described in section 5 of this Part.
The bonds are a pledge of the full faith and credit of the State. The bonds may not run for
a period longer than 10 years from the date of the original issue of the bonds.
Sec. A-2. Records of bonds issued; Treasurer of State. The Treasurer of State
shall ensure that an account of each bond is kept showing the number of the bond, the name
of the successful bidder to whom sold, the amount received for the bond, the date of sale
and the date when payable.
Sec. A-3. Sale; how negotiated; proceeds appropriated. The Treasurer of
State may negotiate the sale of the bonds by direction of the Governor, but no bond may
be loaned, pledged or hypothecated on behalf of the State. The proceeds of the sale of the
bonds, which must be held by the Treasurer of State and paid by the Treasurer of State
upon warrants drawn by the State Controller, are appropriated solely for the purposes set
forth in this Part. Any unencumbered balances remaining at the completion of the project
in this Part lapse to the Office of the Treasurer of State to be used for the retirement of
general obligation bonds.
Sec. A-4. Interest and debt retirement. The Treasurer of State shall pay interest
due or accruing on any bonds issued under this Part and all sums coming due for payment
of bonds at maturity.
Sec. A-5. Disbursement of bond proceeds from General Fund bond issue.
The proceeds of the sale of the bonds authorized under this Part must be expended as
designated in the following schedule under the direction and supervision of the agencies
and entities set forth in this section.
DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION
Provides $85,000,000 for improvements to roads and bridges and $15,000,000 for
nonhighway modes of transportation.
Total $100,000,000
3343 Sec. A-6. Contingent upon ratification of bond issue. Sections 1 to 5 do not
3354 become effective unless the people of the State ratify the issuance of the bonds as set forth
3365 in this Part.
Sec. A-7. Appropriation balances at year-end. At the end of each fiscal year,
all unencumbered appropriation balances representing state money carry forward. Bond
proceeds that have not been expended within 10 years after the date of the sale of the bonds
lapse to the Office of the Treasurer of State to be used for the retirement of general
obligation bonds.
Page 1 - 132LR0975(01)

Sec. A-8. Bonds authorized but not issued. Any bonds authorized but not issued
within 5 years of ratification of this Part are deauthorized and may not be issued, except
that the Legislature may, within 2 years after the expiration of that 5-year period, extend
the period for issuing any remaining unissued bonds for an additional amount of time not
to exceed 5 years.
Sec. A-9. Referendum for ratification; submission at election; form of
question; effective date. This Part must be submitted to the legal voters of the State at
a statewide election held in the month of November 2025. The municipal officers of this
State shall notify the inhabitants of their respective cities, towns and plantations to meet,
in the manner prescribed by law for holding a statewide election, to vote on the acceptance
or rejection of this Part by voting on the following question:
"Do you favor a $100,000,000 bond issue for improvements to roads and
bridges and nonhighway modes of transportation?"
The legal voters of each city, town and plantation shall vote by ballot on this question
and designate their choice by a cross or check mark placed within a corresponding square
below the word "Yes" or "No." The ballots must be received, sorted, counted and declared
in open ward, town and plantation meetings and returns made to the Secretary of State in
the same manner as votes for members of the Legislature. The Governor shall review the
returns. If a majority of the legal votes are cast in favor of this Part, the Governor shall
proclaim the result without delay and this Part becomes effective 30 days after the date of
the proclamation.
The Secretary of State shall prepare and furnish to each city, town and plantation all
ballots, returns and copies of this Part necessary to carry out the purposes of this
referendum.
PART B
Sec. B-1. Authorization of bonds. The Treasurer of State is authorized, under the
direction of the Governor, to issue bonds in the name and on behalf of the State in an
amount not exceeding $100,000,000 for the purposes described in section 5 of this Part.
The bonds are a pledge of the full faith and credit of the State. The bonds may not run for
a period longer than 10 years from the date of the original issue of the bonds.
Sec. B-2. Records of bonds issued; Treasurer of State. The Treasurer of State
shall ensure that an account of each bond is kept showing the number of the bond, the name
of the successful bidder to whom sold, the amount received for the bond, the date of sale
and the date when payable.
Sec. B-3. Sale; how negotiated; proceeds appropriated. The Treasurer of State
may negotiate the sale of the bonds by direction of the Governor, but no bond may be
loaned, pledged or hypothecated on behalf of the State. The proceeds of the sale of the
bonds, which must be held by the Treasurer of State and paid by the Treasurer of State
upon warrants drawn by the State Controller, are appropriated solely for the purposes set
forth in this Part. Any unencumbered balances remaining at the completion of the project
in this Part lapse to the Office of the Treasurer of State to be used for the retirement of
general obligation bonds.
Page 2 - 132LR0975(01)

Sec. B-4. Interest and debt retirement. The Treasurer of State shall pay interest
due or accruing on any bonds issued under this Part and all sums coming due for payment
of bonds at maturity.
Sec. B-5. Disbursement of bond proceeds from General Fund bond issue.
The proceeds of the sale of the bonds authorized under this Part must be expended as
designated in the following schedule under the direction and supervision of the agencies
and entities set forth in this section.
DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION
Provides $85,000,000 for improvements to roads and bridges and $15,000,000 for
nonhighway modes of transportation.
Total $100,000,000
1121 Sec. B-6. Contingent upon ratification of bond issue. Sections 1 to 5 do not
1132 become effective unless the people of the State ratify the issuance of the bonds as set forth
1143 in this Part.
Sec. B-7. Appropriation balances at year-end. At the end of each fiscal year,
all unencumbered appropriation balances representing state money carry forward. Bond
proceeds that have not been expended within 10 years after the date of the sale of the bonds
lapse to the Office of the Treasurer of State to be used for the retirement of general
obligation bonds.
Sec. B-8. Bonds authorized but not issued. Any bonds authorized but not issued
within 5 years of ratification of this Part are deauthorized and may not be issued, except
that the Legislature may, within 2 years after the expiration of that 5-year period, extend
the period for issuing any remaining unissued bonds for an additional amount of time not
to exceed 5 years.
Sec. B-9. Referendum for ratification; submission at election; form of
question; effective date. This Part must be submitted to the legal voters of the State at
a statewide election held in the month of November 2026. The municipal officers of this
State shall notify the inhabitants of their respective cities, towns and plantations to meet,
in the manner prescribed by law for holding a statewide election, to vote on the acceptance
or rejection of this Part by voting on the following question:
"Do you favor a $100,000,000 bond issue for improvements to roads and
bridges and nonhighway modes of transportation?"
The legal voters of each city, town and plantation shall vote by ballot on this question
and designate their choice by a cross or check mark placed within a corresponding square
below the word "Yes" or "No." The ballots must be received, sorted, counted and declared
in open ward, town and plantation meetings and returns made to the Secretary of State in
the same manner as votes for members of the Legislature. The Governor shall review the
returns. If a majority of the legal votes are cast in favor of this Part, the Governor shall
proclaim the result without delay and this Part becomes effective 30 days after the date of
the proclamation.
Page 3 - 132LR0975(01)

The Secretary of State shall prepare and furnish to each city, town and plantation all
ballots, returns and copies of this Part necessary to carry out the purposes of this
referendum.